Idaho statutes. Title 70 WATERCOURSES AND PORT DISTRICTS
Chapter 2
COEUR D’ALENE RIVER AND LAKE COMMISSION

Sec.

§ 70-201. Commission created.

A commission of three (3) members is hereby created to be known and designated as the “Coeur d’Alene River and Lake Commission.” Said commission shall consist of the chairman of the boards of county commissioners of Kootenai and Shoshone counties in this state and the attorney general of the state of Idaho. A majority of said commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

§ 70-202. Organization — Claims for expenses.

The members of said commission shall meet and effect an organization by electing a chairman and secretary from its membership. Said commission shall pass upon all claims for expenses incurred under the provisions of this chapter, and shall either approve or disapprove the same; and all such claims approved by it shall be by it presented to the state board of examiners as hereinafter provided for.

§ 70-203. Time and place of meeting.

Said commission shall meet at such times and places as may be designated by the chairman.

§ 70-204. Duties of commission — Report to legislature.

The duties of said commission shall be to study and investigate ways and means of eliminating from the Coeur d’Alene River and Coeur d’Alene Lake, so far as practicable, all industrial wastes which pollute or tend to pollute the same, and to determine and recommend methods of preventing pollution detrimental to vegetation and domestic crops; to public health or to the health of animals, fish or aquatic life, or detrimental to the use of waters for recreational purposes, and in the performance of such duties, the commission shall have the power to investigate the character of all waste discharged into or deposited on the banks of the said waters. A report of the findings and recommendations of the commission shall be made to the twenty-second legislature of the state of Idaho for its information.

§ 70-205. Hearings before commission.

The said commission shall have the power to hold hearings, require the attending of witnesses and take testimony whenever it shall be deemed necessary in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. Any commissioner is hereby authorized and empowered to administer oaths to any witnesses called to testify in any hearing or proceeding before such commission. Witnesses’ fees and mileage of such witnesses shall be the same as allowed to witnesses subpoenaed in civil cases in the district courts in this state.

§ 70-206. Services and assistance.

Said commission may require the services and assistance of the state chemist and sanitary engineer and may employ such other competent technical assistance as it may require.

§ 70-207. Salary and expenses.

No official or employee of the state of Idaho, or any county thereof, shall receive any compensation in addition to his salary, either as a member of said commission or an employee thereof, and the hotel and traveling expense of the members of this commission from Kootenai and Shoshone counties shall be borne by the said counties.

§ 70-208. Allowance of claims.

All claims for expenses incurred under the provisions of this chapter shall be made against the state of Idaho for payment from the moneys herein appropriated. Such claims shall be made in the manner and form as other claims against the state are made; and, after approval by the commissioner as herein provided for, shall be presented to the state board of examiners for action; and, if allowed by them, as proper claims against the moneys herein appropriated, it shall be the duty of the state controller to draw and deliver to the claimants warrants for such claims against said moneys; and, upon presentation of such warrants to the state treasurer, it shall be his duty to pay such warrants from the said moneys herein appropriated.